Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.320

Disability beneficiary—Restoration to service.

A disability beneficiary who has been or shall be reinstated to active service shall from the date of restoration again become a member of the retirement system; and shall contribute to the retirement system in the same manner as prior to the disability retirement. Any prior service and membership service, on the basis of which retirement allowances were computed at the time of retirement, shall be restored to full force and effect, and, except in the case of retirement for nonduty disability as provided in RCW 41.40.230, he or she shall be given membership service for the period of time out of service due to the disability.

[ 1991 c 35 s 88; 1953 c 200 s 16; 1951 c 50 s 10; 1949 c 240 s 23; 1947 c 274 s 33; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-33.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.